District of Columbia statutes.
22-2304

Penalties.

(a)

Any person convicted of violating any provision of § 22-2302 shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or be imprisoned not more than 90 days or both.

(b)

In lieu of or in addition to the penalty provided in subsection (a) of this section, a person convicted of violating any provision of § 22-2302 may be required to perform community service as provided in § 16-712.

Nov. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 10-54, § 5, 40 DCR 5450
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 225, 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-3314.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $300” in (a).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 225 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.